dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="dollar__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="yen__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mott__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lire__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="contain/er__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>er</l>          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="äpple__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bi__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" a="PT">       <p><l>t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="raseri__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" a="PT">       <p><l>t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="alfabet__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en; invariable indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="badhus__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en; indefinite genitive in ~ø -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="chips__n"> <!-- PT: Neuter; # / # / ~ / ~en;  -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="jeans__n"> <!-- PT: Common; # / # / ~ / ~en;  -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<!-- PT -->
<pardef n="vax__n_nt" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erna -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\Ø__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vin__n_nt" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erna -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="förebyggande"><i>förebyggande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knyte"><i>knyte</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sittande"><i>sittande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
    <e lm="växande"><i>växande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="alfabet">         <i>alfabet</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="barn">            <i>barn</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="däck">            <i>däck</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="boningshus">      <i>boningshus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="chips">           <i>chips</i><par n="chips__n"/></e>
<e lm="höns">            <i>höns</i><par n="chips__n"/></e>
<e lm="dödsbo">          <i>dödsbo</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="egnahemshus">     <i>egnahemshus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="fly">             <i>fly</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="frö">             <i>frö</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="gods">            <i>gods</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="komplex">         <i>komplex</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gummiharts"><i>gummiharts</i><par n="vax__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="benporslin"><i>benporslin</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vax"><i>vax</i><par n="vax__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="toxafen"><i>toxafen</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rendezvous"><i>rendezvous</i><par n="vax__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bigift"><i>bigift</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="harts"><i>harts</i><par n="vax__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="silversalt"><i>silversalt</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="golvvax"><i>golvvax</i><par n="vax__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="portionssnus"><i>portionssnus</i><par n="vax__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vin"><i>vin</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ormgift"><i>ormgift</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="konstharts"><i>konstharts</i><par n="vax__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="nobelpris">       <i>nobelpris</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="paradis">         <i>paradis</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="skrå">            <i>skrå</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="småbarn">         <i>småbarn</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="spädbarn">        <i>spädbarn</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="stearinljus">     <i>stearinljus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="bi">              <i>bi</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="homo">            <i>homo</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="koncept">         <i>koncept</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="kvarter">         <i>kvarter</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="us-dollar" a="PT"><i>us-dollar</i><par n="dollar__n"/></e>
<e lm="dollar" a="is">   <i>dollar</i><par n="dollar__n"/></e>
<e lm="elände" a="is">   <i>elände</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="jeans" a="PT">    <i>jeans</i><par n="jeans__n"/></e>
<e lm="livsmedelspris" a="PT"><i>livsmedelspris</i><par n="vax__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="samexistens" a="PT"><i>samexistens</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="samarbete" a="is"><i>samarbete</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="sökande" a="is">  <i>sökande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="lidande" a="is">  <i>lidande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="raseri" a="PT">   <i>raseri</i><par n="raseri__n"/></e>
<e lm="socialistsparti" a="is"><i>socialistsparti</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="strå" a="SVINF"><i>strå</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="blänk" a="SALDO">           <i>blänk</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="cent" c="domain:valuta" a="PT">            <i>cent</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="container" a="SALDO">       <i>contain</i><par n="contain/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="glasögon" a="SALDO">        <i>glasögon</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="hänsyn" a="SALDO">          <i>hänsyn</i><par n="dollar__n"/></e>
<e lm="lager" c="domain:mat" a="PT">           <i>lager</i><par n="contain/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="lire" c="domain:valuta" a="PT">            <i>lire</i><par n="lire__n"/></e>
<e lm="margarin" a="SALDO">        <i>margarin</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="mott" c="domain:djur" a="PT">            <i>mott</i><par n="mott__n"/></e>
<e lm="personal" a="SALDO">        <i>personal</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="rand" c="domain:valuta" a="PT">            <i>rand</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="skri" a="SALDO">            <i>skri</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="spänn" a="SALDO">           <i>spänn</i><par n="dollar__n"/></e>
<e lm="stängningsdags" a="SALDO">  <i>stängningsdags</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="yen" c="domain:valuta" a="PT">            <i>yen</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
